Utah statutes.
78B-14-104 (Superseded 07/01/13).   Remedies cumulative.

(1)  Remedies provided by this chapter are cumulative and do not affect the availability of remedies under other law, including the recognition of a support order of a foreign country or political subdivision on the basis of comity.

(2)  This chapter does not:

(a)  provide the exclusive method of establishing or enforcing a support order under the law of this state; or

(b)  grant a tribunal of this state jurisdiction to render judgment or issue an order relating to child custody or parent-time in a proceeding under this chapter.

